Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 1 Hunting, Trapping, or Fishing

27-2-1.
Hunting, trapping, or fishing without license or permit generally; nonresidents.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt, fish, trap, or possess any wildlife or feral hog without first procuring all of the licenses, stamps, or permits required or authorized under this title.

It shall be unlawful for any resident of this state who has attained the age of 16 years to hunt, fish in the waters of this state, or trap without a valid hunting license, fishing license, or trapping license, respectively, as provided in Code Section 27-2-23, except on premises owned by him or her or his or her immediate family; provided, however, that the resident owner of any vessel with a valid registration in accordance with Code Section 52-7-5 shall have, as part of the registration fee for such vessel, a paid one-day resident hunting and fishing license valid only on the anniversary of such owner’s date of birth in accordance with the requirements of this title and as otherwise specified by the department. It shall be unlawful for any resident of this state to hunt, fish, or trap in this state without carrying such license upon his or her person, except on premises owned by him or her or his or her immediate family and except when otherwise specifically directed by authorized personnel of the department.

It shall be unlawful for any person not a resident of Georgia who has attained the age of 16 years to hunt, fish in the waters of this state, or trap in this state without a valid nonresident hunting, fishing, or trapping license, respectively, as provided in Code Section 27-2-23, except as otherwise specifically provided by law and interstate agreements. It shall be unlawful for any nonresident to hunt, fish in the waters of this state, or trap without carrying such license on his or her person, unless otherwise specifically directed by authorized personnel of the department.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, no license shall be required to fish with permission of the owner from noncommercial premises not open to the public, including docks and foreshores of such premises, or at a facility or on a charter boat licensed pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 27-2-23.2.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 13; Ga. L. 1916, p. 114, § 3; Ga. L. 1925, p. 302, § 27; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Ga. L. 1931, p. 178, § 6; Code 1933, §§ 45-201, 45-204, 45-205; Ga. L. 1935, p. 379, § 1; Ga. L. 1935, p. 480, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 463, § 6; Ga. L. 1952, p. 258, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 166, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 173, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, §§ 30, 31; Ga. L. 1966, p. 6, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, §§ 7, 10; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1265, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 20; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2290, § 6; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1255, § 6; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1320, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 144, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 6/HB 155; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 2/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “a paid one-day resident hunting and fishing license valid only on the anniversary of such owner’s date of birth” for “a paid three-day resident hunting and fishing license that begins on such owner’s date of birth and extends two consecutive days thereafter” in the first sentence of subsection (b). See Editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Unlawful acts pertaining to hunting, trapping or fishing, generally, §

27-1-3

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-2.
Issuance and sale of hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses; identification required; withdrawal of agents’ authority to sell licenses; online licensing system to allow making of anatomical gifts; anatomical gift education and awareness.

Hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses shall be issued and sold by the department on forms containing such information as may be prescribed by the department. As used in this Code section, the term “license” shall include all permits, licenses, or stamps issued by the department under Code Section 27-2-23. Licenses for hunting and fishing may be sold in each county by persons approved by the department to be license agents.

Each license agent may be required to:

Remit to the department a premium which shall entitle him or her to coverage under a blanket performance bond provided by the department. The premium, which may include the reasonable cost of administering a self-insurance program, shall be in an amount determined by the commissioner, and shall be due and payable annually upon billing by the department;

Account for all license sales and the monetary receipts from such sales in reports to the department, which reports shall be on a schedule and in a form specified by the written agreement between the license agent and the department. Failure to remit license sales receipts as specified in the agreement may result in suspension of the license agent’s ability to sell licenses; and

Receive for himself or herself no more than 60¢ for each license issued, except for nonresident hunting licenses and resident sportsman’s licenses, for which the license agent may receive $1.25 for each license issued, and except for licenses sold by telephone by an approved telephone license agent or over the Internet by an approved Internet license agent, for which the agent may charge and receive up to $5.00 per transaction in addition to the actual cost of the license or licenses sold during the transaction; provided, however, that neither the telephone license agent nor the Internet license agent shall receive any additional fee per license sold during a telephone or Internet transaction; provided, further, that the sale of one or more licenses to one applicant during one telephone call or one Internet session shall constitute a single transaction.

(b.1)

Any person who applies to be a license agent after June 30, 1998, shall be assessed a fee not to exceed the fair market cost of automated licensing equipment the department shall install in such agent’s place of business. Such fees shall be due and payable upon installation of the automated equipment.

The commissioner may either purchase a blanket performance bond for the department’s license agents from or through the Department of Administrative Services or any other source or establish a self-insurance bond by retaining all moneys paid to the department for the premium established pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, all moneys received as interest, and nonappropriated funds received from other sources to establish and maintain a reserve fund for the purpose of making payments to the department upon the defalcations of license agents and defraying the expenses necessary to administer the program; provided, however, that no revenue collected from taxes, fees, and assessments for state purposes shall be deposited in such fund. The commissioner shall invest any such moneys in the same manner as other moneys in his or her possession. The commissioner is authorized, in his or her discretion, to contract for any or all of the services necessary to carry out the functions enumerated in this Code section.

Prior to selling any license, except for a license sold over the telephone by an approved telephone license agent or over the Internet by an approved Internet license agent, each license agent shall require each person desiring to purchase a license to display a driver’s license or equally reliable identification of the individual and the current residence and age of such individual. In the event the department determines that a license agent has intentionally or negligently sold a resident license to a person who is a nonresident or who is underage, the department may immediately withdraw the authority of such license agent to issue and sell licenses on behalf of the department, provided that the department shall not withdraw the license agent’s authority until the license agent has been given ten days’ written notice of intention to withdraw authority setting forth the reason or reasons for the withdrawal and giving the license agent a hearing in the county of said agent’s residence on the reasons for withdrawal.

The General Assembly finds that it is in the best interest of this state to encourage improved public education and awareness regarding anatomical gifts of human organs and tissues and to address the ever-increasing need for donations of anatomical gifts for the benefit of the citizens of Georgia.

Whenever any person applies for or requests the issuance or renewal of any hunting, fishing, or trapping license through the department’s online licensing system, excluding those requested through license agents, the department shall allow the applicant to make an anatomical gift pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, the “Georgia Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.” The department shall not be required to keep the physical record of the donor’s application once it has entered the information into the online system and issued the license in order for the anatomical gift to be valid.

The department website shall provide links to organ procurement websites and provide information describing anatomical gifts, along with the need for and benefits of anatomical gifts.

The department, with the consent of the applicant, shall make available to organ procurement organizations or secure data centers maintained and managed at the direction of such organizations information as provided for in Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, the “Georgia Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act,” including the name, license number, date of birth, gender, and most recent address of any person eligible pursuant to such Act who obtains a fishing, hunting, or trapping license and who indicates such person’s desire to be an organ donor; provided, however, that the information shall be made available only to an organ procurement organization or secure data center if such organization or center has sufficient funds to reimburse the department for reasonable costs associated with the application process and providing such information. Information so obtained by such organizations and centers shall be used for a state-wide organ donor registry accessible to organ tissue and eye banks authorized to function as such in this state and shall not be further disseminated.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 173, § 5; Code 1933, §§ 45-206, 45-218; Ga. L. 1935, p. 379, § 2; Ga. L. 1935, p. 386, § 7; Ga. L. 1941, p. 463, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1943, p. 537, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1156, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1577, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1952, p. 258, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 28; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1159, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 45-301, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 17-19; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2290, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 924, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1255, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 144, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 179, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 915, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 946, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 6; Ga. L. 2019, p. 816, § 1/SB 99; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 27/SB 429.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (e). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “resident sportsman’s licenses” for “resident sportsman licenses” near the beginning of paragraph (b)(3).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, paragraph (b)(4) was redesignated as subsection (b.1) and, in subsection (b), “and” was added at the end of paragraph (2) and a period was substituted for “; and” at the end of paragraph (3).

Cross references.

Voter registration incorporated into resident hunting, fishing or trapping licenses, §

21-2-221.1

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 179, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, set forth the legislative intent of that Act.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 816, § 2/SB 99, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be applicable to all licenses issued on or after July 1, 2019.”

27-2-3.
Effective periods of hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses generally; multiyear licenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, all hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses, including without limitation commercial fishing and commercial fishing boat licenses issued pursuant to Code Section 27-2-8, shall be effective from April 1 to March 31 of the following year; except that all annual, two-year, or other multiyear hunting, fishing, and hunting and fishing combination licenses issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) through (4) of Code Section 27-2-23 shall be effective through the applicable one-year, two-year, or multiyear anniversary of the date of issuance. If a person possesses a valid annual, two-year, or other multiyear hunting, fishing, or hunting and fishing combination license at the time of sale of one or more annual, two-year, or other multiyear licenses with identical privileges to the valid license, the new license or licenses shall become effective when the original license expires and shall remain valid through the full applicable period. The department may specify the effective dates and term of the following licenses or permits:

The Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp to meet requirements of Code Section 27-2-20;

The free Georgia salt water fishing endorsement to meet requirements of Code Section 27-2-20.1; and

Any permit or requirement authorized by Code Section 27-3-29 regarding harvest recording and reporting.

Multiyear licenses valid for any desired number of years may be purchased through a single transaction for licenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (4) of Code Section 27-2-23. The fee for any such multiyear license shall be equivalent to the lowest cost combination of annual or two-year licenses necessary to form the desired multiyear license period. No resident license shall be valid at the time of hunting or fishing unless the licensee is a resident of this state at such time, except for lifetime licenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 30; Code 1933, § 45-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 22; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1552, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 3; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 27/SB 103; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 1/HB 326; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 27/HB 942; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 3/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the last two sentences in subsection (a); added paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(3); and, in the last sentence of subsection (b), substituted “No resident license” for “No multiyear license” at the beginning and added “, except for lifetime licenses” at the end. See Editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-3.1.
Hunting licenses; sportsman’s license; license card carrier requirement; creation of lifetime sportsman’s licenses.

The requirements in this title for procuring any paid license or permit for noncommercial hunting and fishing privileges, except for harvesting alligators, shall be satisfied by a resident or nonresident who procures a sportsman’s license; provided, however, that the department may specify other nonpaid licenses and permits required by law or by rule or regulation of the board. An applicant for such license shall furnish all information required by the department prior to the issuance of such license. An applicant for any paid or nonpaid license who is a resident shall certify and provide satisfactory evidence of his or her residency as set forth in paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of this Code section.

All licenses, stamps, or permits for noncommercial hunting and fishing privileges shall be attached to or printed on a form provided by the department which shall include the applicant’s name, address, date of birth, and hunter safety certification number; provided, however, that each such item of information may be, but is not required to be, printed on lifetime licenses.

The requirements in this title for procuring any paid license, stamp, or permit for noncommercial hunting and fishing privileges shall be satisfied by a resident or nonresident who procures a lifetime sportsman’s license; provided, however, that the department may specify other required nonpaid licenses and permits required by law or by rule or regulation of the board for such resident or nonresident and that an applicant for such license shall furnish all information required by the department prior to the issuance of such license; and provided, further, that the requirements in this title for procuring any paid license, stamp, or permit for noncommercial hunting or for noncommercial fishing privileges, separately, shall be satisfied by a resident or nonresident who procures a lifetime sportsman’s license for hunting only or for fishing only, respectively, as described in subparagraph (d)(1)(E) of this Code section.

An applicant for a veteran’s lifetime sportsman’s license shall, in addition to satisfactory evidence of residency, be required to provide satisfactory evidence that he or she served more than 90 days of federal active duty military service and was honorably discharged.

An applicant for a lifetime sportsman’s license who is a nonresident shall not be eligible for issuance of such license unless:

He or she is from two through 15 years of age and is the grandchild of a resident who holds a valid paid lifetime sportsman’s license (excluding a no-cost Type S lifetime license). The resident grandparent who holds such a lifetime sportsman’s license and who is the sponsor of an eligible nonresident applicant for a lifetime sportsman’s license shall certify the nonresident applicant’s relationship to him or her in writing to the department; or

He or she is less than two years of age.

For purposes of procuring a lifetime sportsman’s license, the term “residency” means a domicile within Georgia for a minimum of three consecutive months immediately prior to procuring such license. Satisfactory evidence of residency shall consist of a current Georgia driver’s license or official Georgia identification card issued by the Department of Driver Services; provided, however, that no license or identification card issued pursuant to Code Section 40-5-21.1 shall satisfy the requirements of this paragraph.

Minors under 18 years of age shall be presumed to be residents upon proof of parent’s resident status as provided for in this Code section. For purposes of procuring the Type I (Infant) and Type Y (Youth) lifetime license, a copy of a certified copy of the birth certificate of the licensee shall be required to show age (Types I and Y) and parentage (Type Y). A court order or other legal document establishing parental rights or legal custody may be provided to show parentage.

Type A (Adult), available to those individuals 16 years to 49 years of age: $750.00;

Type SD (Senior Discount), available to those individuals 60 years to 64 years of age: $315.00;

Type S (Senior), available to those individuals 65 years of age or older born on or before June 30, 1952: no charge. The lifetime sportsman’s licenses and fees available to those individuals 65 years of age and older born after June 30, 1952, shall be as follows:

Type V (Veterans), available only to those individuals who served more than 90 days of federal active duty military service and were honorably discharged: 80 percent of the amount of the fee specified for Type A lifetime sportsman’s licenses in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

Type M (Military), available only to those residents currently in active military service and who are in possession of a valid United States Department of Defense Common Access Card with a Uniformed Services affiliation. As used in this subsection, the term “active military service” means service on active duty with the armed forces of the United States or service with a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States, including service in the Georgia National Guard or National Guard of another state: 80 percent of the amount of the fee specified for Type A lifetime sportsman’s licenses in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph; and

Type SP (Shooting Preserve), available to any individual, resident or nonresident, and which entitles the holder to hunt pen raised game birds and fish in any private or state waters within the boundaries of a properly licensed shooting preserve: $75.00.

Lifetime sportsman’s licenses and fees for residents shall be as follows:

Type SP (Senior Paid): $70.00;

Type SH (Senior Hunt), for hunting only: $35.00; and

Type SF (Senior Fish), for fishing only: $35.00;

The fee for any lifetime sportsman’s license for a nonresident, Type NR, shall be twice the amount of the fee for a Type A (Adult) lifetime sportsman’s license for a resident, except that the fee for a nonresident Type I (Infant) license shall be the same fee as for a resident Type I (Infant) license.

After July 1, 2017, the General Assembly shall not increase the cost of any license provided for in this subsection by more than 20 percent.

(C.1)

Type OA (Older Adult), available to those individuals 50 years to 59 years of age: $375.00;

Lifetime sportsman’s licenses shall be valid for the lifetime of the purchaser, whether resident or nonresident. Change of residency to another state shall not affect the validity of the lifetime license when hunting or fishing in Georgia.

The commissioner shall revoke the lifetime sportsman’s license of any person who knowingly attempts to or does purchase, obtain, or assist another person to obtain a lifetime sportsman’s license by fraudulent means, without refund of any fees paid.

Upon payment of a replacement fee of up to $15.00, any durable plastic card showing a lifetime sportsman’s license or other valid license may be replaced if lost, stolen, or destroyed, provided that the applicant’s name and lifetime license number or other required license information are in the records of the department.

Once a lifetime license is issued, no refunds of fees will be made except in the case of the death before age 16 years of a Type I (Infant) lifetime license holder or a Type Y (Youth) license holder, in which case a full refund of fees collected may be made upon submission of the lifetime license and any other documentation required by the department.

The requirements in this title for procuring any paid license, stamp, or permit for noncommercial hunting and fishing privileges shall be satisfied by a resident youth younger than 16 years of age who procures an optional annual or an optional multiyear resident youth sportsman’s license. The requirements in this title for procuring any paid license, stamp, or permit for noncommercial fishing privileges shall be satisfied by a youth younger than 16 years of age who procures an optional annual or an optional multiyear resident youth license for fishing only. A resident youth multiyear fishing license or resident youth multiyear sportsman’s license will be valid from the time of purchase until such person reaches 17 years of age. The department may require satisfactory evidence to show age and residency before issuing an annual or youth multiyear license.

(A)

Type I (Infant), available only to those individuals under two years of age: $500.00;

(B)

Type Y (Youth), available only to those individuals from two through 15 years of age: $600.00;

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 946, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 826, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 7; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 27; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 338, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 11-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2007, p. 91, § 1A/HB 81; Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 2/HB 326; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 27/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2013, p. 771, § 4/HB 155; Ga. L. 2014, p. 859, § 1/HB 786; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 27/HB 90; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 4/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote subsection (a); inserted “paid” near the beginning and added the proviso at the end of paragraph (c)(1); deleted former paragraph (c)(2), which read “An applicant for such license who is a resident shall certify and provide satisfactory evidence of his or her residency as set forth in paragraph (5) of this subsection.”; redesignated former paragraphs (c)(3) through (c)(5) as present paragraphs (c)(2) through (c)(4), respectively; in paragraph (c)(3), substituted “a lifetime sportsman’s licence” for “such license” in the introductory language and substituted “(excluding a no-cost Type S lifetime license)” for “(not a Type S lifetime license)” in the first sentence of subparagraph (c)(3)(A); in subparagraph (c)(4)(b), inserted “or legal custody” in the last sentence; in paragraph (d)(1), substituted “$500.00” for “$200.00” in subparagraph (d)(1)(A), substituted “$600.00” for “$350.00” in subparagraph (d)(1)(B), substituted “$750.00” for “$500.00” in subparagraph (d)(1)(C), added subparagraph (d)(1)(C.1), substituted “60 years to 64 years of age: $315.00” for “60 years of age or older: $95.00” in subparagraph (d)(1)(D), rewrote subparagraph (d)(1)(E), deleted “and” at the end of
subparagraph (d)(1)(F), added subparagraph (d)(1)(G), and redesignated former subparagraph (d)(1)(G) as present subparagraph (d)(1)(H); added paragraph (d)(3); substituted “$15.00” for “$10.00” near the beginning of subsection (g); and added subsection (i). See Editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-4.
Honorary and discounted hunting and fishing licenses.

The department shall issue a discounted hunting and fishing license, which shall entitle a resident to hunt and fish in this state without the payment of fees described in Code Section 27-2-23, to each resident who is permanently and totally disabled. For purposes of this Code section, a permanent, total disability shall be a physical or mental impairment of a total and permanent nature which is certified as such by the United States Department of Veteran Affairs, the Social Security Administration, Medicaid, medicare, the Railroad Retirement System, or a unit of federal, state, or local government recognized by the board by rule or regulation; provided, however, that persons disabled because of a mental impairment shall be issued a discounted fishing license only. Persons issued a discounted license under disability provisions shall renew such licenses and recertify their eligibility for such licenses every three years; provided, however, that licenses in effect as of July 1, 1998, shall not require renewal. The fee for a discounted three-year license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be $9.00 for hunting or fishing only and $15.00 for hunting and fishing combined. The fee for a discounted annual license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be $3.00 for hunting or fishing only and $5.00 for hunting and fishing combined.

Any resident who is totally blind and who applies to the department shall receive a lifetime honorary fishing license which shall entitle the holder thereof to fish in this state without the payment of any fee whatsoever.

Any person holding a valid honorary or discounted license pursuant to this Code section shall not be required to obtain the trout license and big game license otherwise required by Code Section 27-2-6.

All honorary and discounted hunting and fishing licenses are subject to all wildlife laws, rules, and regulations with the exception of the provisions requiring the payment of fees described in Code Section 27-2-23 for such licenses. Such honorary and discounted licenses may be revoked in accordance with this title. It shall be unlawful for any person who has an honorary or discounted hunting and fishing license to permit the use of same by any other person. It shall also be unlawful for any person who is not entitled to a discounted hunting and fishing license to use such a license or for any totally and permanently disabled person issued such a license to possess or use such license when the disability is no longer total or permanent. Licenses for the totally and permanently disabled may, upon a determination that the disability is no longer total or permanent, be revoked until such time as the disability is again total and permanent.

The commissioner is authorized to make and enter into agreements from time to time with the proper authorities of various states of the United States regarding nonresident hunting and fishing license fees for persons 65 years of age or older so as to provide discounted hunting and fishing licenses to be issued to nonresidents 65 years of age or older where such practice is reciprocated for Georgia residents in that person’s state of residence.

Persons holding lifetime honorary licenses issued to persons 65 years of age or older prior to April 1, 1999, shall not be required to obtain a lifetime license pursuant to Code Section 27-2-3.1, and such lifetime honorary license shall carry the same rights and privileges as a lifetime license issued pursuant to that Code section.

As used in this subsection, the term “returning veteran” means a person who is discharged from active duty as a member of the regular or reserve component of the United States armed forces, the United States Coast Guard, the Georgia National Guard, or the Georgia Air National Guard and who was on ordered federal duty for a period of 90 days or longer.

The department shall issue an honorary hunting and fishing license to any returning veteran which shall entitle him or her to hunt and fish in this state without the payment of fees described in Code Section 27-2-23 for a period of one year following issuance. A returning veteran requesting such an honorary license shall provide proof of his or her discharge.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1194, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1956, p. 590, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 461, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 228, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 6, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 38, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1265, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 935, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, §§ 17, 18; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 27; Ga. L. 1988, p. 842, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 27; Ga. L. 1994, p. 496, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 826, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 213, § 3/SB 258; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 5/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), substituted “a discounted” for “an honorary” in three places, deleted “which prevents gainful employment and” following “total and permanent nature” in the second sentence, deleted “honorary” following “however, that” in the third sentence, and added the last two sentences; inserted “or discounted” in subsection (c); in subsection (d), inserted “and discounted” in the first and second sentences, inserted “or discounted” in the third sentence, and substituted “a discounted” for “an honorary” in the fourth sentence; and, in subsection (e), substituted “discounted” for “honorary” and deleted “without charge” following “licenses to be issued”. See Editor’s note for applicability.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, a comma was inserted following “license” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a comma was deleted following “time” in subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-4.1.
Fishing license reciprocity for Florida residents over 65 years of age.

No fishing license shall be required for any Florida resident who is more than 65 years of age, to the extent that a reciprocal provision exists under Florida law for any Georgia resident who is more than 65 years of age. Florida residents exempted from the requirement of obtaining a fishing license under this Code section shall be entitled to fish in this state without the payment of any fee whatsoever, except that in order to engage in the activities regulated by subsection (a) of Code Section 27-2-6 such a Florida resident must have paid the fee otherwise required for a trout license and must have in his or her possession such proof of such payment as may be prescribed by the department. Florida residents exempted from the requirement of obtaining a fishing license under this Code section are subject to all wildlife laws, rules, and regulations with the exception of provisions requiring fishing licenses. The privileges granted to a Florida resident under this Code section may be suspended or revoked on the same grounds and in the same manner as fishing licenses are suspended and revoked. A Florida resident fishing as authorized by this Code section shall carry upon his or her person proof of his or her age and residence.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 365, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 6.

27-2-4.2.
Courtesy nonresident fishing licenses to certain paralyzed or disabled veterans.

The department is authorized to issue a courtesy nonresident fishing license, without fee, to any person who is not a resident of this state who is a paralyzed or disabled veteran and who is participating in an organized fishing tournament in this state which is sponsored and conducted by a nonprofit charitable association of paralyzed or disabled veterans, provided that such tournament is approved by the department. Such courtesy nonresident license shall be valid for use only during the specified dates of such tournament and for a maximum of seven days and shall include all requirements and privileges of a nonresident fishing license, including the nonresident trout license, for use only in association with such tournament.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-4.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1659, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 6/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the proviso at the end of the first sentence and added “and shall include all requirements and privileges of a nonresident fishing license, including the nonresident trout license, for use only in association with such tournament” at the end of the last sentence. See Editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Discount for certified disabled veterans, §

12-3-9.1

.

Veterans affairs, T. 38, C. 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-2-4.3.
Special hunting privileges for young people with a terminal illness.

As used in this Code section, the term “terminal illness” means an incurable or irreversible condition with a corresponding life expectancy that does not exceed 12 months.

The commissioner is authorized to issue special authorization to hunt big game or alligators to any person not older than 21 years of age who has been diagnosed with a terminal illness by a doctor of medicine currently licensed to practice either by the Georgia Composite Medical Board or the State Board of Examiners in Osteopathy. Such special authorization may include waiving legal weapons requirements, antler restrictions, quota limitations, or hunter education requirements as necessary to facilitate special situations for persons with a terminal illness. The commissioner may impose any terms and conditions deemed necessary to implement the special authorization. Such authorization shall be for only one hunting season.

The commissioner may prepare an application to be used by persons requesting special authorization and may require signed documentation from a doctor of medicine currently licensed to practice either by the Georgia Composite Medical Board or the State Board of Examiners in Osteopathy verifying that an applicant has a terminal illness.

A person who receives special authorization to hunt under this Code section shall conduct all hunting under the direct supervision of a licensed adult hunter and abide by the terms and conditions of the special authorization issued by the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-4.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 889, § 2/SB 309.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 889, § 1/SB 309, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Taylor’s Law.’ ”

27-2-4.4.
Special turkey hunting season for young and mobility impaired hunters.

As used in this Code section, the term “mobility impaired person” means any person who has been verified by a doctor of medicine currently licensed to practice by the Georgia Composite Medical Board, the State Board of Examiners in Osteopathy, or an equivalent body of another state to have any one of the following permanent conditions:

Dependence upon a wheelchair or similar device for ambulation;

Hemiplegia;

Monoplegia;

Paraplegia; or

Single-leg amputation above the knee.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations authorizing the hunting of turkeys during an extended open season to:

Any person who is 16 years of age or younger; or

Any mobility impaired person.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Code Section 27-3-15 to the contrary, such extended season shall be for the weekend prior to the first weekend of the open turkey season, as established by the board.

Such special authorization shall be subject to all other provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-2-4.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 538, § 1/HB 207.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, “Dependence” was substituted for “Dependance” in paragraph (a)(1).